Utah statutes.
17D-2-505.   Security for local building authority bonds.
(1)  The principal of and interest on bonds that a local building authority
issues under this part:
(a)  shall be secured by a pledge and assignment of the revenue that the local
building authority receives under its lease agreement with respect to the
project that was financed with the bond proceeds;
(b)  may be secured by:
(i)  a mortgage covering some or all of the project;
(ii)  a pledge and assignment of the lease agreement for that project;
(iii)  money held in a reserve fund; and
(iv)  any other security device with respect to the project that the local
building authority considers most advantageous.
(2)  A proceeding under which a mortgage is given to secure the bonds of a
local building authority may contain any agreement or provision listed in
Section 17D-2-503 that could be contained in a proceeding under which a local
building authority is authorized to issue bonds under this part.
(3)  A mortgage to secure bonds issued by a local building authority under
this part may provide that:
(a)  upon default in its payment or the violation of any covenant or agreement
contained in the mortgage, the mortgage may be foreclosed in the manner
permitted by law; and
(b)  the trustee or holder of any bond secured by the mortgage may become the
purchaser at a foreclosure sale, if the trustee or holder is the highest
bidder.
